Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2292.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5101 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5101. Obstructing administration of law or other governmental function.[A] (a) Offense defined.--Except as defined under subsection (b), a person commits a misdemeanor of the second degree if he intentionally obstructs, impairs or perverts the administration of law or other governmental function by force, violence, physical interference or obstacle, breach of official duty, or any other unlawful act, except that this section does not apply to flight by a person charged with crime, refusal to submit to arrest, failure to perform a legal duty other than an official 123456789101112131415161718 duty, or any other means of avoiding compliance with law without affirmative interference with governmental functions.(b) Exceptions.--The owner, operator or an employee of a health care facility, including an emergency department, located within this Commonwealth may, through nonviolent means, deny or otherwise obstruct the entry of a law enforcement officer acting in the officer's official capacity onto the premises of the facility, including a parking lot owned by the facility, unless the law enforcement officer:(1) can demonstrate probable cause that a person to be detained, arrested or otherwise taken into custody is on the premises of the facility; and(2) possesses on the officer's person a judicial warrant that clearly demonstrates that the person to be detained, arrested or otherwise taken into custody is the subject of the judicial warrant.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emergency department." An entity within a hospital that is organizationally distinct from other outpatient facilities and whose primary function is to provide emergency accident or emergency medical or surgical care."Health care facility." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 3302 (relating to definitions)."Judicial warrant." A written order signed by a judicial officer from a Federal Article III court or a state court that directs a law enforcement agency or some other person who is specifically named in the order to arrest an individual."Law enforcement officer." A member of the Pennsylvania 20260HB2292PN3002 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Police Force, an individual employed in a position requiring certification under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 (relating to employees), an officer or employee of a Federal agency or an individual acting on behalf of a Federal agency in an official capacity, temporarily or permanently in the service of the United States, whether with or without compensation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2292PN3002 - 3 - 1234567